Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
CHAPTER 2 Elections and Primaries Generally

Cross references.

Subpoena and audit of voting records, §

35-3-4.5

.

Referendum for ratification or rejection of annexation resolution, §

36-36-58

.

Elections relating to incurring of bonded debt by counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions, §

36-82-1

et seq.

Special election for filing of vacancies in office of district attorney, § 45-5-3.2.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Registration of electors, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Election Board, Chapter 183-1-6.

Election districts and polling places, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Election Board, Chapter 183-1-7.

Certification of voting systems, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Secretary of State Elections Division, Chapter 590-8-1.

Help America Vote Act of 2002 Provisions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Secretary of State Elections Division, Chapter 590-8-2.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the evolution of municipal annexation law in Georgia in light of Plantation Pipe Line Co. v. City of Bremen,

227 Ga. 1

,

178 S.E.2d 868

(1970), see 5 Ga. L. Rev. 499 (1971).

For article, “Election Emergencies: Voting in the Wake of Natural Disasters and Terrorist Attacks,” see 67 Emory L.J. 545 (2018).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).